Washington statutes.
RCW 19.230.152

Reports—Nationwide licensing system.

Each licensee shall submit reports of condition through a nationwide licensing system which must be in the form and must contain the information as the director may require.

[ 2017 c 30 s 13; 2014 c 36 s 4.]